Utah statutes.
41-1a-1319.   Third degree felony -- Odometer violation.

It is a third degree felony for a person, with intent to defraud, to:

(1)  disconnect, turn back, replace, or reset or cause to be disconnected, turned back, replaced, or reset, the odometer of any motor vehicle with the intent to reduce the true number of miles or kilometers indicated on it;

(2)  knowingly sell, transfer, or exchange, or cause to be sold, transferred, or exchanged without the disclosure required by Section 41-1a-902, any motor vehicle on which the odometer has been disconnected, turned back, replaced, or reset; or

(3)  give or cause to be given a false odometer mileage disclosure statement when an odometer statement is required by Section 41-1a-902.

